Maryland, session 2025, HB0116.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) (3) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0116*

HOUSE BILL 116
(ix) hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance if[:
1. the benefits are provided under a separate policy,
certificate, or contract;
2. there is no coordination between the provision of the
benefits and an exclusion of benefits under any group health plan maintained by the same
employer;
3. the benefits are paid with respect to an event, without
regard to whether benefits are provided with respect to the event under any group health
plan maintained by the same employer; and
4. the benefits are payable in a fixed dollar amount per
period of time, regardless of the amount of expenses incurred] THE COVERAGE QUALIFIES
FOR THE EXCEPTION DESCRIBED IN 45 C.F.R. § 146.145(B)(4); or
15–1301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) (2) “Health benefit plan” does not include:
(iv) hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance if[:
1. offered as independent, noncoordinated benefits;
2. the benefits are paid in a fixed dollar amount per period of
hospitalization, illness, or service, regardless of the amount of expenses incurred and of the
amount of benefits provided with respect to the event or service under any other health
coverage; and
3. a notice is displayed prominently in the application
materials, in at least 14 point type, that has the following language in capital letters: “This
is a supplement to health insurance and is not a substitute for major medical coverage.
Lack of major medical coverage (or other minimum essential coverage) may result in an
additional payment with your taxes.”] THE COVERAGE QUALIFIES FOR THE EXCEPTION
DESCRIBED IN 45 C.F.R. § 148.220(B)(4); or
15–1401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(h) (2) “Health benefit plan” does not include:

HOUSE BILL 116 3
(iii) the following benefits if offered as independent, noncoordinated
benefits:
1. coverage only for a specified disease or illness; and
2. hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance, if
the [benefits are payable in a fixed dollar amount per period of time, regardless of the
amount of expenses incurred] COVERAGE QUALIFIES FOR THE EXCEPTION DESCRIBED
IN 45 C.F.R. § 146.145(B)(4); or
31–101.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (4) “Health benefit plan” does not include the following benefits if the
benefits are provided under a separate policy, certificate, or contract of insurance, there is
no coordination between the provision of the benefits and any exclusion of benefits under
any group health plan maintained by the same plan sponsor, and the benefits are paid with
respect to an event without regard to whether the benefits are provided under any group
health plan maintained by the same plan sponsor:
(i) coverage only for a specified disease or illness; OR
(ii) [group] hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance,
if the [benefits are payable in a fixed dollar amount per period of time, such as $100 per
day of hospitalization, regardless of the amount of expenses incurred; or
(iii) individual hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity
insurance, if:
1. the benefits are paid in a fixed dollar amount per period of
hospitalization, illness, or service, regardless of the amount of expenses incurred and of the
amount of benefits provided with respect to the event or service under any other health
coverage; and
2. a notice is displayed prominently in the application
materials, in at least 14 point type, that has the following language in capital letters: “This
is a supplement to health insurance and is not a substitute for major medical coverage.
Lack of major medical coverage (or other minimum essential coverage) may result in an
additional payment with your taxes.”] COVERAGE QUALIFIES FOR THE EXCEPTION
DESCRIBED IN 45 C.F.R. § 146.145(B)(4) AND 45 C.F.R. § 148.220(B)(4).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.